Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1182.01
Volunteers and certain service providers; expenses; payment; when.

Any department, agency, commission, council, committee, or board of the state may pay for the reasonable and necessary expenses for the recruitment, training, utilization, and recognition of volunteers providing services to the state and certain providers of services as established by the Director of Administrative Services. No payment shall be made unless it is in accordance with policies and procedures established by the Director of Administrative Services. For purposes of this section, volunteers and providers shall mean those persons performing services for the state under a state-recognized program as established by the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1993, LB 448, § 1.